Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.270

Program for development of women, minority-owned, and veteran-owned licensed driver training schools—Report.

The office shall develop a program to foster the development of women, minority-owned, and veteran-owned licensed driver training schools in the state, including through instruction on topics relevant to owning and operating a licensed driver training school, and shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024, with an update on program implementation and administration.

[ 2023 c 445 s 6.]